South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4140.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-13-25(F) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (F) The county board of voter registration and elections shall provide the hours of operation for the early voting center or centers in accordance with the following: (1) for statewide general elections and statewide primaries, the early voting centers must be open from 8:30 a.m. until 6:00 p.m. on each day of the early voting period; (2) for any election that is not a statewide general election, statewide primary, or runoff election, the early voting centers must be open Monday through Friday from 8:30 a.m. until 5:00 p.m. during the early voting period; (3) for any runoff election, the early voting centers must be open on the Wednesday through Friday immediately preceding the election and must be open from 8:30 a.m. until 5:00 p.m.; and (4) for any election, the early voting centers must not be open on Sundays or on legal holidays. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----